Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1904
Development district; duties.

A development district shall, as directed by its policy board, serve as a regional resource center and provide planning, community and economic development, and technical assistance to local governments which are members of the district and may provide assistance to industrial development organizations, tourism promotion organizations, community development groups, and similar organizations upon request.

Laws 1992, LB 573, § 4.